District of Columbia statutes.
42-3707

Annual audit; annual report; budget to compensate capitalization deficiency

Expired.

Expiration of chapter: Section 9(b) of D.C. Law 5-98, as amended by § 2(c) of D.C. Law 6-152, provided that the act shall expire 5 years from the date it becomes effective. D.C. Law 5-98 became effective August 10, 1984.